Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.200

Arrest and attachment, when, authorized.

In an action against a personal representative as such, the remedies of arrest and attachment shall not be allowed on account of the acts of his or her testator or intestate, but for his or her own acts as such personal representative, such remedies shall be allowed for the same causes in the manner and with like effect as in actions at law generally.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2042; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.200. Prior: Code 1881 s 724; 1877 p 147 s 729; 1869 p 167 s 666; RRS s 973.]